Hawaii statutes.
§607-7 Deposit and payment of fees and
costs on appeal. [(a)] All fees and costs required to be paid upon the
filing of a notice of appeal from a court shall be paid to the clerk of the
court from which the appeal is taken. The clerk of the court shall immediately
transmit a record of the payments and deposits, along with a copy of the notice
of appeal, to the clerk of the supreme court. The required fees and costs for
an appeal shall be payable only once upon the initial filing of the appeal.
The deposit shall be made at the time of filing the notice of appeal.

[(b)] Where the appeal is from a governmental
official or body other than a court, the required costs and fees for filing the
appeal shall be made payable to the clerk of the court to which the appeal is
taken and transmitted by the government official or body upon receipt to the
clerk of the court to which the appeal is taken, along with a copy of the
notice of appeal. If an appeal from a government official or body is taken
directly to the intermediate appellate court, the required costs and fees for
the appeal shall be payable only once, upon the initial filing of the appeal.
[RL 1935, pt of §3791; am L 1939, c 19, pt of §1; RL 1945, §9747; RL 1955,
§219-7; HRS §607-7; am L 1970, c 188, §29; am L 1972, c 88, §5(1); am L 1979, c
111, §5(3); am L 2004, c 3, §3 as superseded by c 202, §65; am L 2006, c 91, §5
and c 94, §1; am L 2010, c 109, §1]

Rules of Court

Dismissal for nonpayment, see HRCP rule 72(h).

Case Notes

Nondeposit of costs did not render ineffective a timely filed
notice of appeal. 57 H. 168, 552 P.2d 355 (1976).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next